Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
RECORDED PROGRAMS
SECTION 1.  ORS 329A.030 is amended to read:
329A.030. (1) The Office of Child Care shall  establish a Central Background Registry and may
maintain information in the registry through electronic records systems.
(2)(a) A subject individual shall apply to and must be enrolled in the  Central Background Reg-
istry as part of the individual’s application to operate  a program or serve in a position described in
subsection (10) of this section.
(b) An individual who has  been the subject of a founded or substantiated report of child abuse
shall apply to and must be enrolled in the Central Background Registry prior to providing any of
the types of care identified in ORS 329A.250 (4)(b)(A), (G) or (H) if:
(A) The child abuse occurred on or after January 1, 2017, and  involved a child who died or
suffered serious physical injury, as defined in ORS 161.015; or
(B) The child abuse occurred on or after September 1, 2019, and involved any  child for whom
the individual was providing child care, as  defined in ORS 329A.250 (4), or care identified in ORS
329A.250 (4)(b)(A), (C), (F), (G), (H) or (I).
(c) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, an individual described in paragraph (b)(B)
of this subsection is not required to enroll in the Central Background Registry if more  than seven
years has elapsed since the date of the child abuse determination.
(3)(a) Upon receiving an application for enrollment in the  Central Background Registry, the of-
fice shall complete:
(A) A criminal records check under ORS 181A.195;
(B) A criminal records check of  other registries or databases in accordance with rules adopted
by the Early Learning Council;
(C) A child abuse and neglect records check in  accordance with rules adopted by the council;
and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 1
(D) A foster care certification check and an adult protective services  check in accordance with
rules adopted by the council.
(b) In addition to the information that the office is required to check  under paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the office may consider any other information obtained by the office that  the office, by
rule, determines is relevant to enrollment in the Central Background Registry.
(4)(a) The office shall  enroll the individual in the Central Background Registry if the individual:
(A) Is determined to have no criminal, child abuse and neglect,  negative adult protective ser-
vices or negative foster home certification history, or  to have dealt with the issues and provided
adequate evidence of suitability for the registry;
(B) Has paid the applicable fee established pursuant to ORS 329A.275; and
(C) Has  complied with the rules of the Early Learning Council adopted pursuant to this section.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section and paragraph (a) of this subsection,  the office
may enroll an  individual in the registry if the Department of Human Services has completed a
background check on the individual  and the individual has received approval from the department
for purposes of providing child care.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding  subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the office may not enroll an indi-
vidual in the Central Background Registry if:
(A) The individual has a disqualifying condition as defined in rules adopted by the council; or
(B) The individual is an exempt prohibited individual, as provided by ORS 329A.252.
(b) If an individual prohibited  from enrolling in the registry as provided by this subsection is
enrolled in the registry, the office shall remove the individual from the registry.
(6)(a) The office may conditionally enroll an individual  in the Central Background Registry
pending the results  of a nationwide criminal records check through the Federal Bureau of Investi-
gation if the individual has successfully completed the criminal records  check and the child abuse
and neglect records check in this state and in the state of the individual’s  residence, if other than
Oregon.
(b) The office may enroll an individual in the registry subject to  limitations identified in rules
adopted by the council.
(7) An enrollment in the Central  Background Registry may be renewed upon application to the
office, payment of the fee established pursuant to ORS 329A.275 and compliance with rules adopted
by the Early Learning Council pursuant to this section. However, an individual who is determined
to be ineligible for enrollment in the registry after the date of initial enrollment  shall be removed
or suspended from the registry by the office.
(8)(a) A child care facility [ shall], preschool recorded program or school-age recorded  pro-
gram may  not hire or  employ an individual if the individual is not enrolled in the Central Back-
ground Registry.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a child care  facility , preschool recorded
program or school-age recorded program  may employ on a probationary basis  an individual who
is conditionally enrolled in the Central Background Registry.
(9) The  Early Learning Council may adopt any rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this
section, including but not limited to rules regarding expiration and renewal  periods and limitations
related to the subject individual’s enrollment in the Central Background Registry.
(10) [ For purposes of ] As used in  this section, “subject  individual” means a subject individual
as defined by the Early Learning Council by rule, an individual subject to subsection (2)(b) of  this
section or a person who applies to be:
(a) The operator or an employee of a child care or treatment program;
(b) The operator or an  employee of an Oregon prekindergarten program under ORS 329.170 to
329.200;
(c) The operator or an employee of a federal Head Start program  regulated by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services;
(d) An individual in a child care  facility , preschool recorded program or school-age recorded
program who may have unsupervised contact with children as identified by the office;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 2
(e) A contractor or  an employee of the contractor who provides early childhood special educa-
tion or early intervention services pursuant to ORS 343.455 to 343.534;
(f) A child care  provider who is required to be enrolled in the Central Background Registry by
any state agency;
(g) A contractor, employee or volunteer of a metropolitan service district organized under  ORS
chapter 268 who may have unsupervised contact with children  and who is required to be enrolled
in the Central Background Registry by the metropolitan service district;
(h) A provider of respite services, as defined in  ORS 418.205, for parents pursuant to a properly
executed power of attorney under ORS 109.056 who is providing respite services  as a volunteer with
a private agency or organization that facilitates the provision of such respite services; [ or]
(i) The  operator or an employee of an early learning program as defined in rules adopted by the
council[ .]; or
(j) The operator or an employee of a preschool  recorded program or a school-age re-
corded program.
(11)(a) Information provided to a metropolitan service district  organized under ORS chapter 268
about the enrollment status of the persons described in subsection  (10)(g) of this section shall be
subject to a reciprocal agreement with  the metropolitan service district. The agreement must pro-
vide for the recovery of  administrative, including direct and indirect, costs incurred by the office
from participation in the agreement. Any moneys collected under  this paragraph shall be deposited
in the Child Care Fund established under ORS 329A.010.
(b) Information provided to a  private agency or organization facilitating the provision of respite
services, as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents pursuant to  a properly executed power of attorney
under ORS 109.056 about the enrollment status of  the persons described in subsection (10)(h) of this
section shall be subject to an agreement with the private  agency or organization. The agreement
must provide for the recovery of administrative, including direct  and indirect, costs incurred by the
office from participation in the agreement. Any moneys collected  under this paragraph shall be de-
posited in the Child Care Fund established under ORS 329A.010.
(c) Information provided to a private agency or organization about the enrollment status of  the
persons described  in subsection (10)(i) of this section shall be subject to an agreement with the
private agency or organization. The  agreement must provide for the recovery of administrative, in-
cluding direct and indirect, costs incurred  by the office from participation in the agreement. Any
moneys collected under this paragraph shall be deposited in the Child Care Fund established under
ORS 329A.010.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 329A.252 is amended to read:
329A.252. (1) As used in this section, “exempt prohibited individual” means:
(a) An individual whose record, certification or registration is suspended, has  been denied for
cause or has been revoked for cause under ORS 329A.255 or 329A.350.
(b) An individual whose enrollment in the Central Background Registry  established by ORS
329A.030 is suspended, has been denied for cause or has been removed for cause  under ORS
329A.030.
(c) An individual whose record, certification, registration or enrollment  in the Central Back-
ground Registry is subject to an emergency order of suspension under ORS 183.430 (2).
(d) An individual  who voluntarily surrendered the individual’s record, certification, registration
or enrollment in  the Central Background Registry while under investigation by the Office of Child
Care or at any time after the Office of Child Care has given  notice of an administrative proceeding
against the individual , [ or] the individual’s child  care facility , the individual’s preschool recorded
program or the individual’s school-age recorded program .
(e) An individual to whom the Office of Child Care has issued a final order  to cease and desist:
(A) After a contested proceeding; or
(B) That has become effective because the individual did not request a hearing.
(2) For five years following the date on  which an individual becomes an exempt prohibited in-
dividual, the exempt prohibited individual:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 3
(a) Is ineligible for enrollment in the Central Background Registry; and
(b) May not provide care to a child who is  not related to the exempt prohibited individual by
blood or marriage within the fourth degree as determined by civil law.
(3) After the five-year period described in subsection (2) of this section,  an individual ceases to
be an exempt prohibited individual if the individual enrolls in the Central Background Registry.
(4) Notwithstanding the five-year period described in subsection (2) of this section, an individual
shall be permanently considered an exempt prohibited individual  and shall be permanently subject
to the prohibitions described in subsection (2) of this section if the individual:
(a) Has been convicted of, in any state,  a crime in which a child suffered serious physical injury,
as defined in ORS 161.015, or death; or
(b) Is required to report as a sex offender under ORS 163A.010, 163A.015, 163A.020 or  163A.025
or the laws of another jurisdiction.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 329A.255 is amended to read:
329A.255. [ (1) A person operating a preschool recorded  program may not operate the program
without performing criminal  background checks for all staff and volunteers and becoming recorded
with the Office of Child Care as provided in this section. ]
(1) A person may not operate a preschool recorded program or a school-age recorded
program unless the program is recorded with the Office of Child  Care as provided in this
section.
(2) To obtain recording, the person operating the program  must apply to the office by  sub-
mitting a completed record application form and a nonrefundable fee  as established by the office.
The office shall determine  and apply the fee through rules adopted by the Early Learning Council
under ORS 329A.275. The office shall deposit fees received under this  subsection as provided in ORS
329A.310 (2).
(3) The office shall issue a record to [ a person ] the applicant  [ operating a preschool recorded
program] if the office determines that the applicant meets the requirements of ORS  329A.030 and
329A.250 to 329A.450 and the rules adopted  pursuant to ORS  329A.030 and  329A.250 to 329A.450
and subsection (9) of this section.
(4) Unless the record is  revoked as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the record is valid
for a period of two years from the date of issuance.
(5) A record  authorizes operation of the [ preschool recorded ] program only on the premises de-
scribed in the record and only by the person named in the record.
(6) The office shall create and maintain  a database of [ preschool recorded ] programs recorded
under this section and shall update the database annually.  The database [ shall] must  include, but
need not be limited to, the following information:
(a) Name and address of the program;
(b) Name of operator; and
(c) Significant program information, as determined by the Early Learning Council by rule.
(7) A [ preschool recorded ] program  recorded under this section must post, and provide parents
with, a notice that the [ preschool recorded ] program is not certified under ORS 329A.280  or regis-
tered under ORS 329A.330.
(8) An initial application or renewal application for recording of a  [preschool recorded ] program
under this section  may be denied, revoked or suspended, if the office finds:
(a) That the program or its operation  does not comply with ORS 329A.030 or  329A.250 to
329A.450, with applicable rules and with any term or condition imposed under the record; or
(b) That investigation of the program  or its records authorized by ORS 329A.390 has not been
permitted.
(9) The Early Learning Council shall adopt any rules necessary  to carry out the provisions of
this section.
(10) A person who violates any provision of this section or any term or  condition of a record
is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $100.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 329A.390 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 4
329A.390. (1) Whenever an authorized representative of the Office of Child Care is advised or
has reason to believe that child  care that is subject to regulation by the office is being provided
without a certification, registration  or record, the authorized representative may visit and conduct
an investigation of the facility at  any reasonable time to determine whether the facility is subject
to the requirements of ORS 181A.200, 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(2) At  any reasonable time, an authorized representative of the Office of Child Care may conduct
an investigation of any certified or registered child care facility  or  program recorded under ORS
329A.255 to determine whether the child  care facility or program  is in conformity with ORS
181A.200, 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450 and the rules promulgated pursuant to  ORS 181A.195,
181A.200, 181A.215, 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(3) An authorized representative of  the Office of Child Care shall conduct an investigation of
any certified or registered child care facility , of any program recorded under ORS 329A.255  or
of any other child care facility that is subject to regulation by the office  if the office receives a
serious complaint about the child care facility  or program .
(4) Complaints, including but not limited to serious complaints, made by individuals or  entities
regarding certified or registered child care facilities, regulated subsidy facilities, preschool  recorded
programs or school-age recorded programs may be received  and investigated by the Office of Child
Care. The name, address and other identifying information about the individual or entity that  made
the complaint may not be disclosed.
(5) Any state agency that receives a complaint about a certified  or registered child care facility,
a regulated subsidy facility, a preschool recorded  program or a school-age recorded program shall
notify the Office of Child Care about the complaint and any subsequent  action taken by the state
agency based on that complaint.
(6) A director or operator of  a child care facility, a regulated subsidy facility, a preschool re-
corded program or a school-age recorded program shall permit an authorized representative of the
Office of Child Care to inspect  records of the facility or program and shall furnish promptly reports
and information required by the office.
(7) In conducting an investigation under this section, the office may:
(a) Take evidence;
(b) Take the depositions  of witnesses, including the person under investigation, in the manner
prescribed by law for depositions in civil actions;
(c) Compel the appearance of witnesses, including the person under investigation, in the  manner
prescribed by law for appearances in civil actions;
(d) Require answers to interrogatories;
(e) Compel the production of  books, papers, accounts, documents or testimony that pertains to
the matter under investigation;
(f) Issue subpoenas; and
(g) Inspect the premises of the facility under investigation.
(8) The Office of Child Care may share information regarding investigations or inspections con-
ducted under this section with other public entities when the office determines that  sharing the in-
formation would support the health or safety of children in child care.
(9) The Office of Child Care  shall make a reasonable attempt to identify any child care facility
or person or place providing child care about which the office  receives a complaint, including but
not limited to a  serious complaint, if the complaint includes, but is not limited to, any of the fol-
lowing information:
(a) The name of a child in the care of the child care facility or person or place providing  child
care, or the child’s parent;
(b) The name of a child care provider, a child care  facility owner, operator or employee, or a
person or place providing child care;
(c) The name of the child care facility or person or place providing child care;
(d) The phone number of the child care facility or person or place providing child care; or
(e) The physical address of the child care facility or person or place providing child care.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 5
(10) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Serious complaint” has the meaning  given that term by the Early Learning Council by
rule.
(B) “Serious complaint” includes notifications or reports  of alleged child abuse received by the
Office of Child Care.
(b) “Regulated subsidy facility” has the meaning  given that term by the Early Learning Council
by rule.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 329A.250, as amended by section 40, chapter 631, Oregon  Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
329A.250. As used in ORS 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450, unless the context requires  oth-
erwise:
(1) “Babysitter” means a person who goes into the home of a child to give care during  the
temporary absence of the parent or legal guardian or custodian.
(2) “Certification” means the certification that is issued under ORS 329A.280 by  the Office of
Child Care to a family child care home, child care center or other child care facility.
(3) “Child” means a child under 13 years of age  or a child under 18 years of age who has special
needs or disabilities and requires a level of care that is above normal for the child’s age.
(4)(a) “Child care” means the care, supervision and guidance on a regular basis of a child, un-
accompanied by a parent,  guardian or custodian, provided to a child during a part of the 24 hours
of the day, in a place other than the child’s home, with or without compensation.
(b) “Child care” does not include care provided:
(A) In the home of the child;
(B) By the child’s parent, guardian, or person acting in loco parentis;
(C) By a  person related to the child by blood or marriage within the fourth degree as determined
by civil law;
(D) On an occasional basis by a person not ordinarily engaged in providing child care;
(E) By providers of medical services;
(F) By a babysitter;
(G) By a person who cares for children from only one  family other than the person’s own family;
(H) By a person who cares for no more than three children other than  the person’s own chil-
dren; or
(I) By a person who is a member of  the child’s extended family, as determined by the office on
a case-by-case basis.
(5) “Child care facility” means any facility that provides child care to children,  including a day
nursery, nursery school, child care center,  certified or registered family child care home or similar
unit operating under any name, but not including any:
(a) Preschool recorded program.
(b) Facility providing care  for school-age children that is primarily a single enrichment activity,
for eight hours or less a week.
(c) Facility providing care that is primarily group athletic  or social activities sponsored by or
under the supervision of an organized club or hobby group.
(d) Facility operated by:
(A) A school district as defined in ORS 332.002;
(B) A political subdivision of this state; or
(C) A governmental agency.
(e) Residential facility licensed under ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
(f) Babysitters.
(g) Facility operated as a parent cooperative for no more than four hours a day.
(h) Facility providing care while the  child’s parent remains on the premises and is engaged in
an activity offered by the facility or in other nonwork activity.
(i) Facility operated as a school-age recorded program.
(6) “Family” has the meaning given that term in ORS 329.155.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 6
(7) “Occasional” means that care is provided for no more than 70 days in any calendar year.
(8) “Parent cooperative” means a child care program in which:
(a) Care is provided by parents on a rotating basis;
(b) Membership in the cooperative includes parents;
(c) There are written policies and procedures; and
(d) A board of directors  that includes parents of the children cared for by the cooperative con-
trols the policies and procedures of the program.
(9) “Preschool recorded program” means a facility providing care for preschool children that  is
primarily educational for  four hours or less per day and where no child is present at the facility for
more than four hours per day.
(10) “Record” means the record that is  issued under ORS 329A.255 to a preschool recorded
program or [ under ORS 329A.257 to ] a school-age recorded program.
(11) “Registration”  means the registration that is issued under ORS 329A.330 by the Office of
Child Care to a family child care home where care is provided in the family  living quarters of the
provider’s home.
(12) “School age” means of an age eligible to be enrolled in  kindergarten or above on or before
the first day of the current school year.
(13) “School-age recorded program” means a program for school-age children:
(a) That is not operated by a school district as defined in ORS 332.002;
(b) That is not required to be certified  under ORS 329A.280 or registered under ORS 329A.330;
and
(c) In which youth development  activities are provided to children during hours that school is
not in session and does not take the place of a parent’s care.
(14) “Youth development activities” means care, supervision or  guidance that is intended for
enrichment, including  but not limited to teaching skills or proficiency in physical, social or educa-
tional activities such as tutoring, music lessons, social activities, sports and recreational activities.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 329A.250 is amended to read:
329A.250. As used in ORS 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450, unless the context requires  oth-
erwise:
(1) “Babysitter” means a person who goes into the home of a child to give care during  the
temporary absence of the parent or legal guardian or custodian.
(2) “Certification” means the certification that is issued under ORS 329A.280 by  the Office of
Child Care to a family child care home, child care center or other child care facility.
(3) “Child” means a child under 13 years of age  or a child under 18 years of age who has special
needs or disabilities and requires a level of care that is above normal for the child’s age.
(4)(a) “Child care” means the care, supervision and guidance on a regular basis of a child, un-
accompanied by a parent,  guardian or custodian, provided to a child during a part of the 24 hours
of the day, in a place other than the child’s home, with or without compensation.
(b) “Child care” does not include care provided:
(A) In the home of the child;
(B) By the child’s parent, guardian, or person acting in loco parentis;
(C) By a  person related to the child by blood or marriage within the fourth degree as determined
by civil law;
(D) On an occasional basis by a person not ordinarily engaged in providing child care;
(E) By providers of medical services;
(F) By a babysitter;
(G) By a person who cares for children from only one  family other than the person’s own family;
(H) By a person who cares for no more than three children other than  the person’s own chil-
dren; or
(I) By a person who is a member of  the child’s extended family, as determined by the office on
a case-by-case basis.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 7
(5) “Child care facility” means any facility that provides child care to children,  including a day
nursery, nursery school, child care center,  certified or registered family child care home or similar
unit operating under any name, but not including any:
(a) Preschool recorded program.
(b) Facility providing care  for school-age children that is primarily a single enrichment activity,
for eight hours or less a week.
(c) Facility providing care that is primarily  group athletic or social activities sponsored by or
under the supervision of an organized club or hobby group.
(d) Facility operated by:
(A) A school district as defined in ORS 332.002;
(B) A political subdivision of this state; or
(C) A governmental agency.
(e) Residential facility licensed under ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
(f) Babysitters.
(g) Facility operated as a parent cooperative for no more than four hours a day.
(h) Facility providing care while the child’s parent remains on the  premises and is engaged in
an activity offered by the facility or in other nonwork activity.
(i) Facility operated as a school-age recorded program.
(6) “Family” has the meaning given that term in ORS 329.145.
(7) “Occasional” means that care is provided for no more than 70 days in any calendar year.
(8) “Parent cooperative” means a child care program in which:
(a) Care is provided by parents on a rotating basis;
(b) Membership in the cooperative includes parents;
(c) There are written policies and procedures; and
(d) A board of directors  that includes parents of the children cared for by the cooperative con-
trols the policies and procedures of the program.
(9) “Preschool recorded program” means a facility providing care for preschool children that  is
primarily educational for  four hours or less per day and where no child is present at the facility for
more than four hours per day.
(10) “Record” means the record that is  issued under ORS 329A.255 to a preschool recorded
program or [ under ORS 329A.257 to ] a school-age recorded program.
(11) “Registration”  means the registration that is issued under ORS 329A.330 by the Office of
Child Care to a family child care home where care is provided in the family  living quarters of the
provider’s home.
(12) “School age” means of an age eligible to be enrolled in  kindergarten or above on or before
the first day of the current school year.
(13) “School-age recorded program” means a program for school-age children:
(a) That is not operated by a school district as defined in ORS 332.002;
(b) That is not required to be certified  under ORS 329A.280 or registered under ORS 329A.330;
and
(c) In which youth development  activities are provided to children during hours that school is
not in session and does not take the place of a parent’s care.
(14) “Youth development activities” means care, supervision or  guidance that is intended for
enrichment, including  but not limited to teaching skills or proficiency in physical, social or educa-
tional activities such as tutoring, music lessons, social activities, sports and recreational activities.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 419B.005, as amended by section 58, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
419B.005. As used in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Abuse” means:
(A) Any  assault, as defined in ORS chapter 163, of a child and any physical injury to a child
which has been  caused by other than accidental means, including any injury which appears to be
at variance with the explanation given of the injury.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 8
(B) Any mental  injury to a child, which shall include only observable and substantial impairment
of the child’s mental  or psychological ability to function caused by cruelty to the child, with due
regard to the culture of the child.
(C) Rape of a child, which includes but is not limited to  rape, sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are described in ORS chapter 163.
(D) Sexual abuse, as described in ORS chapter 163.
(E) Sexual exploitation, including but not limited to:
(i) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a minor, as  defined in ORS chapter 163, and any
other conduct  which allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces or encourages a child to engage
in the performing for people  to observe or the photographing, filming, tape recording or other ex-
hibition which, in whole or in part, depicts sexual conduct or contact, as  defined in ORS 167.002 or
described in ORS 163.665 and  163.670, sexual abuse involving a child or rape of a child, but not in-
cluding any conduct which is part of any  investigation conducted pursuant to ORS 419B.020 or
which is designed to serve educational or other legitimate purposes; and
(ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring  a child to engage in prostitution as described in
ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex act as defined in ORS 163.266, to  purchase sex with a minor as
described in ORS 163.413 or  to engage in commercial sexual solicitation as described in ORS
167.008.
(F) Negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child, including but not limited  to the failure to
provide adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care that  is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of the child.
(G) Threatened harm to a child, which means subjecting a child to a substantial  risk of harm
to the child’s health or welfare.
(H) Buying or selling a person under 18 years of age as described in ORS 163.537.
(I) Permitting  a person under 18 years of age to enter or remain in or upon premises where
methamphetamines are being manufactured.
(J) Unlawful exposure to a controlled substance, as defined in ORS 475.005, or to  the unlawful
manufacturing of a cannabinoid extract, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that subjects a child to  a sub-
stantial risk of harm to the child’s health or safety.
(b) “Abuse” does not  include reasonable discipline unless the discipline results in one of the
conditions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) “Child” means an unmarried person who:
(a) Is under 18 years of age; or
(b) Is under 21 years of age and residing in  or receiving care or services at a child-caring
agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205.
(3) “Higher education institution” means:
(a) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(b) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4)(a) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry into or assessment  of the safety of a child alleged
to have experienced abuse.
(b) “Investigation” does not include screening activities conducted upon the  receipt of a report.
(5) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) A city or municipal police department.
(b) A county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(e) A county juvenile department.
(6) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or physician assistant licensed under  ORS chapter 677 or naturopathic physician,
including any intern or resident.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 9
(b) Dentist.
(c) School employee, including an employee of a higher education institution.
(d) Licensed  practical nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
(e) Employee of the Department of Human Services, Oregon  Health Authority, Department of
Early Learning  and Care, Department of Education, Youth Development Division, Office of Child
Care, the Oregon Youth Authority, a local health department, a community mental health  program,
a community developmental disabilities program, a county juvenile department, a child-caring
agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
(f) Peace officer.
(g) Psychologist.
(h) Member of the clergy.
(i) Regulated social worker.
(j) Optometrist.
(k) Chiropractor.
(L) Certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) Attorney.
(n) Licensed professional counselor.
(o) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(p) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(q) A court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(r) A child care provider registered or certified under ORS 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(s) An elected official of a branch of government of  this state or a state agency, board, com-
mission or department of a  branch of government of this state or of a city, county or other political
subdivision in this state.
(t) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(u) Audiologist.
(v) Speech-language pathologist.
(w) Employee of the Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission directly involved in investi-
gations or discipline by the commission.
(x) Pharmacist.
(y) An operator of a preschool recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(z) An operator of a school-age recorded program under ORS [ 329A.257] 329A.255.
(aa) Employee of a private agency or organization  facilitating the provision of respite services,
as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents  pursuant to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS
109.056.
(bb) An  employee of a public or private organization providing child-related services or activ-
ities:
(A) Including but not limited to an employee of a:
(i) Youth group or center;
(ii) Scout group or camp;
(iii) Summer or day camp;
(iv) Survival camp; or
(v) Group, center or camp that is operated under the guidance, supervision or auspices  of a re-
ligious, public or private educational system or a community service organization; and
(B) Excluding an employee of a qualified victim services program as defined  in ORS 147.600 that
provides confidential, direct services to victims of domestic violence,  sexual assault, stalking or
human trafficking.
(cc) A coach, assistant coach or trainer of an amateur,  semiprofessional or professional athlete,
if compensated and if the athlete is a child.
(dd) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ee) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 10
(ff) Animal control officer, as defined in ORS 609.500.
(gg) Member of a school district board, an education service district board or  a public charter
school governing body.
(hh) An individual who is paid by  a public body, in accordance with ORS 430.215, to provide a
service identified in an individualized written  service plan of a child with a developmental disability.
(ii) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 418.351.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 419B.005 is amended to read:
419B.005. As used in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Abuse” means:
(A) Any  assault, as defined in ORS chapter 163, of a child and any physical injury to a child
which has been  caused by other than accidental means, including any injury which appears to be
at variance with the explanation given of the injury.
(B) Any mental  injury to a child, which shall include only observable and substantial impairment
of the child’s mental  or psychological ability to function caused by cruelty to the child, with due
regard to the culture of the child.
(C) Rape of a child, which  includes but is not limited to rape, sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are described in ORS chapter 163.
(D) Sexual abuse, as described in ORS chapter 163.
(E) Sexual exploitation, including but not limited to:
(i) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a  minor, as defined in ORS chapter 163, and any
other conduct which allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces or encourages a child to  engage
in the performing for people to observe or the photographing, filming, tape  recording or other ex-
hibition which, in whole or in part, depicts sexual conduct or contact, as  defined in ORS 167.002 or
described in ORS 163.665 and 163.670, sexual abuse involving a child or rape of a  child, but not in-
cluding any conduct which is part of any  investigation conducted pursuant to ORS 419B.020 or
which is designed to serve educational or other legitimate purposes; and
(ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring  a child to engage in prostitution as described in
ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex act  as defined in ORS 163.266, to purchase sex with a minor as
described in ORS 163.413 or to engage in commercial sexual solicitation  as described in ORS
167.008.
(F) Negligent treatment or maltreatment  of a child, including but not limited to the failure to
provide adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care  that is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of the child.
(G) Threatened harm to  a child, which means subjecting a child to a substantial risk of harm
to the child’s health or welfare.
(H) Buying or selling a person under 18 years of age as described in ORS 163.537.
(I) Permitting a person under 18 years of age to enter or remain in or upon premises  where
methamphetamines are being manufactured.
(J) Unlawful exposure  to a controlled substance, as defined in ORS 475.005, or to the unlawful
manufacturing of a  cannabinoid extract, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that subjects a child to a sub-
stantial risk of harm to the child’s health or safety.
(b) “Abuse” does not include reasonable discipline unless the discipline results in  one of the
conditions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) “Child” means an unmarried person who:
(a) Is under 18 years of age; or
(b) Is under 21 years of age and residing  in or receiving care or services at a child-caring
agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205.
(3) “Higher education institution” means:
(a) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(b) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 11
(4)(a) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry into or assessment  of the safety of a child alleged
to have experienced abuse.
(b) “Investigation” does not include screening activities conducted upon the  receipt of a report.
(5) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) A city or municipal police department.
(b) A county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(e) A county juvenile department.
(6) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or physician assistant licensed under  ORS chapter 677 or naturopathic physician,
including any intern or resident.
(b) Dentist.
(c) School employee, including an employee of a higher education institution.
(d) Licensed  practical nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
(e) Employee of the Department of  Human Services, Oregon Health Authority, Early Learning
Division, Department of Education, Youth Development Division,  Office of Child Care, the Oregon
Youth  Authority,  a local health department, a community mental health program, a community de-
velopmental disabilities program,  a county juvenile department, a child-caring agency as that term
is defined in ORS 418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
(f) Peace officer.
(g) Psychologist.
(h) Member of the clergy.
(i) Regulated social worker.
(j) Optometrist.
(k) Chiropractor.
(L) Certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) Attorney.
(n) Licensed professional counselor.
(o) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(p) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(q) A court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(r) A child care provider registered or certified under ORS 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(s) An elected official of a branch of government of  this state or a state agency, board, com-
mission or department of a  branch of government of this state or of a city, county or other political
subdivision in this state.
(t) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(u) Audiologist.
(v) Speech-language pathologist.
(w) Employee of the Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission directly involved in investi-
gations or discipline by the commission.
(x) Pharmacist.
(y) An operator of a preschool recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(z) An operator of a school-age recorded program under ORS [ 329A.257] 329A.255.
(aa) Employee of a private agency or organization  facilitating the provision of respite services,
as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents  pursuant to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS
109.056.
(bb) An  employee of a public or private organization providing child-related services or activ-
ities:
(A) Including but not limited to an employee of a:
(i) Youth group or center;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 12
(ii) Scout group or camp;
(iii) Summer or day camp;
(iv) Survival camp; or
(v) Group, center or  camp that is operated under the guidance, supervision or auspices of a re-
ligious, public or private educational system or a community service organization; and
(B) Excluding an employee of a qualified victim services program as defined  in ORS 147.600 that
provides confidential, direct services to  victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking or
human trafficking.
(cc) A coach, assistant coach or trainer of an amateur,  semiprofessional or professional athlete,
if compensated and if the athlete is a child.
(dd) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ee) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ff) Animal control officer, as defined in ORS 609.500.
(gg) Member of a school district board, an education service district board or  a public charter
school governing body.
(hh) An individual who is paid by  a public body, in accordance with ORS 430.215, to provide a
service identified in an individualized written  service plan of a child with a developmental disability.
(ii) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 418.351.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 419B.035 is amended to read:
419B.035. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 192.001  to 192.170, 192.210 to 192.478 and
192.610 to 192.810 relating to confidentiality and accessibility for public inspection of public records
and public documents, reports and records compiled under the provisions of  ORS 419B.010 to
419B.050 are confidential and may not be disclosed except as provided in this  section. The Depart-
ment of Human Services shall make the records available to:
(a) Any law enforcement agency or a child abuse registry in any other state for the  purpose of
subsequent investigation of child abuse;
(b) Any physician, physician assistant licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or nurse  practi-
tioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390,  at the request of the physician, physician assistant
or nurse practitioner, regarding any child brought to  the physician, physician assistant or nurse
practitioner or coming before the physician, physician assistant  or nurse practitioner for examina-
tion, care or treatment;
(c) Attorneys of record for the child or child’s parent or guardian in any juvenile court  pro-
ceeding;
(d) Citizen review boards established by the  Judicial Department for the purpose of periodically
reviewing the status  of children, youths and adjudicated youths under the jurisdiction of the juvenile
court under ORS 419B.100 and 419C.005. Citizen review boards may make such  records available to
participants in case reviews;
(e) A court appointed special advocate in  any juvenile court proceeding in which it is alleged
that a child has been subjected to child abuse or neglect;
(f) The Office of Child Care for certifying, registering or otherwise  regulating child care facili-
ties;
(g) The Office of Children’s Advocate;
(h) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission for investigations  conducted under ORS
339.390 or 342.176 involving any child or any student;
(i) Any person, upon request to the Department of Human Services,  if the reports or records
requested regard an incident in which a child, as the result of abuse, died or suffered serious phys-
ical injury as defined in ORS 161.015. Reports or records  disclosed under this paragraph must be
disclosed in accordance with ORS 192.311 to 192.478;
(j) The Office of Child Care for purposes of ORS 329A.030 [ (10)(g), (h) and (i) ] (10)(g) to (j) ;
(k) With respect to a report of abuse occurring  at a school or in an educational setting that
involves a child with a disability, Disability Rights Oregon;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 13
(L) The Department of Education for  purposes of investigations conducted under ORS 339.391;
and
(m) An education provider for the purpose of making determinations under ORS 339.388.
(2)(a) When disclosing reports and records pursuant to subsection (1)(i) of this section, the De-
partment of Human Services may exempt from disclosure the names, addresses and other identifying
information about other children, witnesses, victims or other persons  named in the report or record
if the department determines, in written findings,  that the safety or well-being of a person named in
the report or  record may be jeopardized by disclosure of the names, addresses or other identifying
information, and if that concern outweighs the public’s  interest in the disclosure of that information.
(b) If the Department of Human Services does not  have a report or record of abuse regarding
a child who,  as the result of abuse, died or suffered serious physical injury as defined in ORS
161.015, the department may disclose that information.
(3) The Department of Human Services may make reports and records compiled under  the pro-
visions of ORS 419B.010 to 419B.050 available to any person, administrative  hearings officer, court,
agency, organization or other entity when the department determines that such disclosure is neces-
sary to administer its child welfare services and is in the best interests of the affected  child, or that
such disclosure is necessary to  investigate, prevent or treat child abuse and neglect, to protect
children from abuse and neglect or for research when the  Director of Human Services gives prior
written approval. The Department of Human Services shall adopt rules setting  forth the procedures
by which it will make the  disclosures authorized under this subsection or subsection (1) or (2) of this
section. The name, address and other identifying information  about the person who made the report
may not be disclosed pursuant to this subsection and subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A law  enforcement agency may make reports and records compiled under the provisions of
ORS 419B.010 to 419B.050 available to other law enforcement agencies, district attorneys, city at-
torneys with criminal prosecutorial functions and the Attorney General when the law enforcement
agency determines that disclosure  is necessary for the investigation or enforcement of laws relating
to child abuse and  neglect or necessary to determine a claim for crime victim compensation under
ORS 147.005 to 147.367.
(5) A law enforcement agency, upon  completing an investigation and closing the file in a specific
case relating to child abuse or  neglect, shall make reports and records in the case available upon
request to any  law enforcement agency or community corrections agency in this state, to the De-
partment of Corrections, to the Oregon Youth Authority or to the State  Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision for  the purpose of managing and supervising offenders in custody or on
probation, parole, post-prison supervision or other form of conditional  or supervised release. A law
enforcement agency may make  reports and records compiled under the provisions of ORS 419B.010
to 419B.050 available to the Oregon Youth Authority, law  enforcement, community corrections,
corrections or parole agencies in  an open case when the law enforcement agency determines that
the disclosure will not interfere  with an ongoing investigation in the case. The name, address and
other identifying information about the person who made the report may not be disclosed under  this
subsection or subsection (6)(b) of this section.
(6)(a) Any  record made available to a law enforcement agency or community corrections agency
in this state, to the Department of  Corrections, the Oregon Youth Authority or the State Board of
Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or to a  physician, physician assistant or nurse practitioner in
this state, as  authorized by subsections (1) to (5) of this section, shall be kept confidential by the
agency, department, board, physician, physician assistant or nurse practitioner. Any record or report
disclosed by the Department of Human Services to other persons or entities pursuant to subsections
(1) and (3) of this section shall be kept confidential.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) A law enforcement agency, a community corrections agency, the Department of  Corrections,
the Oregon Youth Authority  and the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision may disclose
records made available to them under subsection (5) of this section  to each other, to law enforce-
ment, community corrections, corrections and parole agencies of other states and to authorized
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 14
treatment providers  for the purpose of managing and supervising offenders in custody or on pro-
bation, parole, post-prison supervision or other form of conditional or supervised release.
(B) The Department of Corrections and the Oregon  Youth Authority may disclose records made
available to them under subsection (5) of this section regarding a person in the  custody of the De-
partment of Corrections or the Oregon Youth Authority to  each other, to the court, to the district
attorney and to  the person’s attorney for the purpose of the person’s hearing under ORS 420A.200
to 420A.206.
(C) A person may disclose records made available to  the person under subsection (1)(i) of this
section if the records are disclosed for the purpose of advancing the public interest.
(7) Except as provided by ORS 339.389, an officer or employee  of the Department of Human
Services or of a law enforcement agency or any person or entity to  whom disclosure is made pur-
suant to  subsections (1) to (6) of this section may not release any information not authorized by
subsections (1) to (6) of this section.
(8) As used in this section, “law enforcement agency” has the meaning  given that term in ORS
181A.010.
(9) A person who violates subsection (6)(a) or (7) of this section commits a Class A violation.
SECTION 10.
ORS 329A.257 is repealed.
SECTION 11. (1) As used in this section and section  12 of this 2022 Act, “recorded pro-
gram” means a preschool recorded  program or a school-age recorded program, as those
terms are defined in ORS 329A.250.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 329A.030 and subject to subsection (4) of this section, a recorded
program may continue  to employ an individual who is not enrolled in the Central Background
Registry on January 1, 2023, if:
(a) The  individual was employed by the recorded program on and before January 1, 2023;
and
(b) The recorded program completed a criminal background check for the individual  be-
fore January 1, 2023.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 329A.030 and subject to subsection (4) of this section, a recorded
program may continue to allow an individual who  may have unsupervised contact with chil-
dren to volunteer in the recorded program  even though the individual is not enrolled in the
Central Background Registry on January 1, 2023, if:
(a) The individual was  volunteering in the recorded program on and before January 1,
2023; and
(b) The recorded program completed a criminal background check for the individual  be-
fore January 1, 2023.
(4) A recorded program  may not continue to employ or allow an individual to volunteer
in the recorded program as provided in subsections (2) or (3) of this section if:
(a) The individual fails to submit a complete  application for enrollment in the Central
Background Registry on or before June 30, 2023; or
(b) The Office of Child Care issues a notice  of intent to deny the individual’s application
for enrollment in the Central Background Registry.
SECTION 12. The Office of Child Care may accept and process applications for enrollment
in the Central Background Registry in accordance with ORS 329A.030, as amended  by section
1 of this 2022 Act, that are submitted by  current or prospective operators, employees or
volunteers of recorded  programs and that are received by the office before, on or after the
operative date specified in section 19 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 13. Sections 11 and 12 of this 2022 Act are repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECURE TRANSPORTATION SERVICES PROVIDERS
SECTION 14. (1) As used in this section:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 15
(a) “Certified foster home” means a foster home certified by the Department of Human
Services and subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645.
(b) “Child-caring agency” has the meaning given that term under ORS 418.205.
(c) “Developmental disabilities residential facility” means a residential facility or  foster
home for children who are 17 years of age or younger and  receiving developmental disability
services that is subject to ORS 443.400 to 443.455, 443.830 and 443.835.
(d) “Secure escort” means escort services  for a child who poses a risk of elopement or
where restraint or  seclusion may be utilized if the child poses a risk of injury to self or
others, and as further defined by the department by rule.
(e) “Secure nonemergency medical  transportation provider” means a private organization
or person that provides nonemergency medical secure transportation services subject  to
rules adopted by the Oregon Health Authority.
(f) “Secure transportation” means the transport  of a child in a vehicle specifically
equipped to prevent a passenger from  exiting, eloping or interfering with the operator of the
vehicle, and as further defined by the department by rule.
(g) “Secure  transportation services” means the secure transportation or secure escort
of children.
(2) The department shall adopt rules consistent with this  section for the issuance, under
ORS 418.215 and 418.240, of licenses to provide secure transportation services to providers
that are child-caring agencies solely as the result of  providing secure transportation services
as described in ORS 418.205 (2)(a)(B) and for the issuance of supplemental licenses to child-
caring agencies  described in ORS 418.205 (2)(a)(A) that also provide secure transportation
services as described in ORS 418.205 (2)(a)(B).
(3)(a) The following secure transportation services  providers are exempt from the re-
quirements under ORS 418.215 and 418.240  to obtain from the department a license or a
supplemental license to provide secure transportation services:
(A) A secure nonemergency medical transportation provider.
(B) A child-caring  agency that is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized by the de-
partment to provide or engage in the provision of care or services to children if:
(i) The agency is not primarily engaged in the provision of secure transportation services;
(ii) The  child being transported or escorted resides in or is otherwise receiving services
from the agency; and
(iii) The transportation or escort is  provided consistent with the rules adopted by the
department under this section.
(C) An ambulance  service, as defined in ORS 682.025, that is transporting a child in an
ambulance for the purpose of obtaining medical care for the child.
(D) A developmental disabilities residential facility if:
(i) The facility is  not primarily engaged in the provision of secure transportation ser-
vices;
(ii) The  child being transported or escorted resides in or is otherwise receiving services
from the facility; and
(iii) The transportation or escort is  provided consistent with the rules adopted by the
department under this section.
(b) The licensing exemptions under  paragraph (a)(B) and (D) of this subsection do not
apply if the  child-caring agency or developmental disabilities residential facility is trans-
porting the child for the purposes of placing  the child in a facility that is not licensed by the
department or in a hospital that is not licensed by the authority.
(4)(a) A secure transportation services provider, including  a provider that is described in
subsection (3) of this section, must display the disclosure described in ORS 418.359 (2) in  a
conspicuous location in any advertisements or promotional materials for  its secure trans-
portation services and in each  vehicle it uses to provide its secure transportation services
if:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 16
(A) The provider is not  licensed by the department under ORS 418.215 or 418.240 to pro-
vide secure transportation services; and
(B) The provider holds itself out as being an Oregon provider  of secure transportation
services, including by registering in this state the vehicles it uses in  the provision of its se-
cure transportation services  or representing or otherwise indicating in advertisements or
promotional materials that the provider  is based in this state, maintains a mailing address
in this  state or is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized by the department or the au-
thority to provide secure transportation services or similar services in this state.
(b) The disclosure under paragraph (a) of this subsection must also indicate that the  se-
cure transportation services provider  is not licensed by the department under ORS 418.215
or 418.240 to provide secure transportation services and,  if applicable, the reason for the
provider’s licensing exemption under subsection (3) of this section.
(c) If a provider that is required to make a disclosure under  this subsection is authorized
by the authority to provide secure  transportation services, the provider’s disclosure under
this subsection may, consistent with rules adopted  by the authority, also include a statement
that the provider is authorized by the authority to provide secure transportation services.
(5) The department and the authority may adopt rules for the provision of secure trans-
portation services consistent with this section and ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.359 and 418.519
to 418.532.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 418.205 is amended to read:
418.205. As used in ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.330, 418.470, 418.475,  418.950 to 418.970 and
418.992 to 418.998, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Child” means an unmarried person under 21 years of  age who resides in or receives care
or services from a child-caring agency.
(2)(a) “Child-caring agency”  means :
(A) [ Means] Any private school, private agency,  private organization or county program pro-
viding:
(i) Day treatment for children with emotional disturbances;
(ii) Adoption placement services;
(iii) Residential care, including but not limited to  foster care or residential treatment for chil-
dren;
(iv) Residential care in combination with academic education  and therapeutic care, including
but not limited to treatment for emotional, behavioral or mental health disturbances;
(v) Outdoor youth programs; or
(vi) Other similar care or services for children.
(B) Any private organization or person that  provides secure transportation services as
defined in section 14 of this 2022 Act during any segment of a child’s trip to or  from a
child-caring agency, certified foster home as defined in section 14 of this 2022 Act or devel-
opmental disabilities residential facility as defined in section 14 of this 2022 Act, if the  route
of the child’s trip begins or ends in this state.
[(B)] (b) “Child-caring agency”  includes the following:
[(i)] (A) A shelter-care home that is not a foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645;
[(ii)] (B) An independent residence facility as described in ORS  418.475 that meets the standards
established by the Department of Human Services by rule to be considered a child-caring agency;
[(iii)] (C) A private residential boarding school;
[(iv)] (D) A child-caring facility as defined in ORS 418.950; and
[(v) A secure transportation services provider  that transports or provides escort services for chil-
dren on the highways of  this state along a route that begins or ends in this state to or from a school,
agency, organization or program described in subparagraph (A) of this  paragraph, if the school,
agency, organization or program is located in this state or in any other state. ]
(E) A secure nonemergency medical transportation provider,  as defined in section 14 of
this 2022 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 17
[(b)] (c)  “Child-caring agency” does not include:
(A) Residential facilities or  foster care homes certified or licensed by the Department of Human
Services under ORS 443.400 to 443.455, 443.830 and 443.835 for children receiving developmental
disability services;
(B) Any private agency or organization facilitating the provision of respite services  for parents
pursuant to a  properly executed power of attorney under ORS 109.056. For purposes of this sub-
paragraph, “respite services” means the voluntary assumption of short-term care and control  of a
minor child without compensation or reimbursement of expenses for the purpose of providing a
parent in crisis with relief from the demands of ongoing care of the parent’s child;
(C) A youth job development organization as defined in ORS 344.415;
(D) A shelter-care home that is a foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645;
(E) A foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645;
(F) A facility that exclusively serves individuals 18 years of age and older; or
(G) A facility that primarily serves both adults and children but requires that any child must
be accompanied at all times by at least one custodial parent or guardian.
(3) “Child-caring facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.950.
(4)(a) “County program” means any county operated program that provides care or services  to
children:
(A) In the custody of the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Youth Authority; or
(B) Under a contract with the Oregon Health Authority.
(b) “County program” does not include any local juvenile detention facility  that receives state
services provided and coordinated by the Department of Corrections under ORS 169.070.
(5) “Governmental agency” means an executive, legislative  or judicial agency, department,
board, commission, authority, institution or instrumentality of this state or of a  county, municipality
or other political subdivision of this state.
(6) “Independent residence facility” means a facility as described in ORS 418.475.
(7)(a) “Outdoor youth program” means a program that provides, in an  outdoor living setting,
services  to  children who have behavioral problems, mental health problems or problems with abuse
of alcohol or drugs.
(b) “Outdoor youth program” does not include any program, facility or activity:
(A) Operated by a governmental entity;
(B) Operated or affiliated with the Oregon Youth Corps;
(C) Licensed by the Department of Human Services under  other authority of the department; or
(D) Operated by a youth job development organization as defined in ORS 344.415.
(8) “Private” means not owned, operated or administered by any governmental agency or unit.
(9) “Private residential boarding school” means either of the following as the context requires:
(a) A child-caring agency that is a private school  that provides residential care in combination
with academic education and therapeutic care,  including but not limited to treatment for emotional,
behavioral or mental health disturbances; or
(b) A private school providing residential care that is primarily engaged  in educational work
under ORS 418.327.
(10) “Proctor  foster home” means a foster home certified by a child-caring agency under ORS
418.248 that is not subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645.
(11) “Provider of care or services for children”  means a person, entity or organization that
provides care or services to children, regardless  of whether the child is in the custody of the De-
partment of Human Services,  and that does not otherwise meet the definition of, or requirements for,
a child-caring agency. “Provider of care or services for children” includes a proctor foster home
certified by a child-caring agency under ORS 418.248.
(12) “Qualified residential treatment program” means a program described in ORS 418.323.
[(13) “Secure transportation services provider”  means a private organization or person that pro-
vides secure transportation or secure escort services for children to or from a school, agency,  organ-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 18
ization or program described in subsection (2)(a)(A) of this section, if the  school, agency, organization
or program is located in this state or in any other state. ]
[(14)] (13) “Shelter-care home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.470.
SECTION 16.  ORS 418.359 is amended to read:
418.359. (1) A person or organization that  makes a referral or recommendation related to the
use of a secure transportation services provider  to transport a child to a [ school, agency, organiza-
tion or program described in ORS 418.205 (2)(a)(A) ] child-caring agency, certified foster  home or
developmental disabilities residential facility  must provide the written [ referral] disclosure  de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section if the child  to be [ transferred] transported  is a resident of
this state or if the [ school, agency, organization or program ] child-caring agency,  certified foster
home or developmental disabilities residential facility  to which the secure transportation  ser-
vices provider will deliver the child is located in this state.
(2) The [ referral] disclosure under this section must state:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Except as specifically exempted under section 14 of this 2022 Act, [ORS 418.215 requires ]
a secure transportation services provider that transports children to  or from a [ school, agency, or-
ganization or  program ] child-caring agency, certified foster home or developmental disabilities
residential facility along any portion of  a route that  begins or ends in Oregon is required to be
licensed by the Department of Human Services  under ORS 418.215 or 418.240 .
_______________________________________________________________________________________
[(3) As used in this section,  “child” and “secure transportation services provider” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 418.205. ]
(3) As  used in this section, “certified foster home,” “child-caring agency,” “developmental
disabilities residential facility” and “secure  transportation services” have the meanings given
those terms in section 14 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 17.  ORS 418.992 is amended to read:
418.992. (1) In addition to any  other liability or penalty provided by law, the Director of Human
Services may impose a civil penalty :
(a) On a child-caring agency that is subject to ORS 418.205  to 418.327, 418.470, 418.475 or
418.950 to 418.970 for any of the following:
[(a)] (A)  Violation  of any of the terms or conditions of a license, certificate or other authori-
zation issued under ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.470, 418.475 or 418.950 to 418.970.
[(b)] (B)  Violation of any rule adopted by, or  general order of, the Department of Human Ser-
vices that pertains to a child-caring agency.
[(c)] (C) Violation of any final order of  the director that pertains specifically to the child-caring
agency.
[(d)] (D)  Violation of the  requirement to have a license, certificate or other authorization under
ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.470, 418.475 or 418.950 to 418.970.
(b) On a secure transportation services provider, as defined  in section 14 of this 2022 Act,
that violates the disclosure requirement described in section 14 of this 2022 Act.
(2) The director shall impose a civil penalty not to exceed $500, unless otherwise required  by
law, on any child-caring agency for falsifying records, reports, documents or financial  statements
or for causing another person to do so.
(3) The director shall impose a civil penalty of not less than $250 nor more  than $500, unless
otherwise required by law, on a child-caring facility that assumes care or custody  of, or provides
care or services to, a child knowing that  the child’s care needs exceed the license, certificate or
authorization classification of  the child-caring agency if the assumption of care or custody, or pro-
vision of care or services, places that child’s health, safety or welfare at risk.
(4) Unless the health, safety or welfare of a child is at risk, the  director in every case shall
prescribe a reasonable time for elimination of a violation:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 19
(a) Not to exceed 45 days after first notice of a violation; or
(b) In cases where the  violation requires more than 45 days to correct, such time as is specified
in a plan of correction found acceptable by the director.
(5) A civil penalty imposed under this section may be remitted or reduced upon  such terms and
conditions as the director considers proper and consistent with the public health and safety.
(6) The  department shall adopt rules establishing objective criteria for the imposition and
amount of civil penalties under ORS 418.992 to 418.998.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 418.322 is amended to read:
418.322. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Congregate care residential setting” means  any setting that cares for more than one child
or ward and is not a setting described in ORS 418.205 [ (2)(b)(A)] (2)(c)(A) , (D), (E) or (F) or (10).
(b) “Sex trafficking” means the recruitment, harboring, transportation,  provision, obtaining, pa-
tronizing or soliciting of a person under  18 years of age for the purpose of a commercial sex act,
as defined in ORS 163.266, or the recruitment,  harboring, transportation, provision or obtaining of
a person  over 18 years of age using force, fraud or coercion for the purpose of a commercial sex
act, as defined in ORS 163.266.
(2) The Department of Human Services may place a child or  ward in a congregate care resi-
dential setting only if the setting is:
(a) A child-caring agency, as defined in ORS 418.205, a hospital, as  defined in ORS 442.015, or
a rural hospital, as defined in ORS 442.470; and
(b) A qualified residential treatment program described in ORS 418.323.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2)  of this section, the department may place a child or ward in
a child-caring agency that is not a qualified residential treatment program if:
(a) The child-caring agency is providing prenatal, postpartum  or parenting supports to the child
or ward.
(b) The child or ward is placed in an independent residence facility described in ORS  418.475
that is licensed by the department as a child-caring agency.
(c) The child or ward is, or is at risk of becoming, a victim of sex trafficking and the child-caring
agency is providing high-quality residential care and supportive services to the child or ward.
(d) The Oregon Health  Authority has approved the placement as medically necessary and the
child-caring agency:
(A) Is a residential care facility;
(B) Is licensed by the authority and maintains site-specific accreditation from  a nationally re-
cognized organization to provide psychiatric treatment to children; and
(C) Has an active provider agreement with the Oregon Medicaid program.
(e) The child-caring agency is an adolescent residential  drug and alcohol treatment program li-
censed or certified by the State of Oregon to  provide residential care, and the court has approved,
or approval is pending for, the placement in the child-caring  agency of each child or ward over
whom the department retains jurisdiction.
(f) The placement with the child-caring agency is for the purpose of  placing the child or ward
in a proctor foster home.
(g) The child-caring agency is a residential care facility licensed  by the department that pro-
vides short-term assessment and stabilization services.
(h) The child-caring agency is a shelter-care home, as defined in ORS 418.470, that provides
short-term assessment and stabilization services.
(i) The child-caring agency is a homeless, runaway or transitional living shelter  licensed by the
department that provides short-term assessment and stabilization services.
(j) The  ward is 18 years of age or older and the child-caring agency is a residential treatment
facility or a residential home licensed or certified by the department or the Oregon Health Au-
thority.
(4) The  department may not place a child or ward in a residential care facility or shelter-care
home described in subsection (3)(g) or (h) of this section:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 20
(a) For more than 60 consecutive days or 90 cumulative days in a 12-month period; or
(b) If the residential care facility or shelter-care home also serves  youths or adjudicated youths
served by  the county juvenile department or adjudicated youths committed to the custody of the
Oregon Youth Authority by the court.
(5) The department may not place a child or ward  in a homeless, runaway or transitional living
shelter described in subsection (3)(i) of this section for more than 60 consecutive or 90 cumulative
days in any 12-month period.
(6) Calculations of the number of days a child  or ward is placed in a shelter-care home under
subsection (3)(h) of  this section or a homeless, runaway or transitional living shelter under sub-
section (3)(i) of this section exclude the days the child or ward  is in the shelter-care home or shelter
if the child or ward:
(a) Accessed the shelter-care home or shelter without the support or direction of the depart-
ment; and
(b) Is homeless or a runaway, as defined by the department by rule.
(7)(a) Nothing in this  section prohibits the Oregon Youth Authority from placing an adjudicated
youth committed to  its custody in a placement that is not a qualified residential treatment program.
(b) Nothing in this section  prohibits the Oregon Youth Authority or a county juvenile depart-
ment from placing an adjudicated youth or a youth served by the  Oregon Youth Authority or the
county juvenile department in shelter care or detention under ORS chapter 419C.
APPROPRIATION
SECTION 18a.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 603, Oregon Laws  2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for operations, is increased by  $1,224,860 to implement
the provisions of sections 11 and 12 of  this 2022 Act and the amendments to ORS 329A.030,
329A.250, 329A.252, 329A.255, 329A.390, 419B.005 and 419B.035 by  sections 1 to 9 of this 2022
Act.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 19. (1) Section 11 of this 2022 Act, the amendments to ORS 329A.030, 329A.250,
329A.252, 329A.255, 329A.390, 419B.005 and 419B.035 by sections 1 to 9 of this 2022 Act and the
repeal of ORS 329A.257 by section 10 of this 2022 Act become operative on January 1, 2023.
(2) The Office of  Child Care and the Early Learning Council may take any action before
the operative date  specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the office
or council to exercise,  on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this
section, all of the duties, functions and  powers conferred on the office or the council by
section 11 of this 2022 Act, the amendments to ORS  329A.030, 329A.250, 329A.252, 329A.255,
329A.390, 419B.005 and 419B.035 by sections 1 to 9 of this  2022 Act and the repeal of ORS
329A.257 by section 10 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 20. The unit captions  used in this 2022 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 21. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 21
Passed by Senate March 1, 2022
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 4, 2022
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1547 (SB 1547-B) Page 22